Illinois, session 104th, SB2661.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Gambling Act is amended by 5changing Section 7 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 10/7)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2407)7    Sec. 7. Owners licenses. 8    (a) The Board shall issue owners licenses to persons or 9entities that apply for such licenses upon payment to the 10Board of the non-refundable license fee as provided in 11subsection (e) or (e-5) and upon a determination by the Board 12that the applicant is eligible for an owners license pursuant 13to this Act and the rules of the Board. From December 15, 2008 14(the effective date of Public Act 95-1008) until (i) 3 years 15after December 15, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 1695-1008), (ii) the date any organization licensee begins to 17operate a slot machine or video game of chance under the 18Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 or this Act, (iii) the date 19that payments begin under subsection (c-5) of Section 13 of 20this Act, (iv) the wagering tax imposed under Section 13 of 21this Act is increased by law to reflect a tax rate that is at 22least as stringent or more stringent than the tax rate 23contained in subsection (a-3) of Section 13, or (v) when an   SB2661- 2 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1owners licensee holding a license issued pursuant to Section 27.1 of this Act begins conducting gaming, whichever occurs 3first, as a condition of licensure and as an alternative 4source of payment for those funds payable under subsection 5(c-5) of Section 13 of this Act, any owners licensee that holds 6or receives its owners license on or after May 26, 2006 (the 7effective date of Public Act 94-804), other than an owners 8licensee operating a riverboat with adjusted gross receipts in 9calendar year 2004 of less than $200,000,000, must pay into 10the Horse Racing Equity Trust Fund, in addition to any other 11payments required under this Act, an amount equal to 3% of the 12adjusted gross receipts received by the owners licensee. The 13payments required under this Section shall be made by the 14owners licensee to the State Treasurer no later than 3:00 15o'clock p.m. of the day after the day when the adjusted gross 16receipts were received by the owners licensee. A person or 17entity is ineligible to receive an owners license if:18        (1) the person has been convicted of a felony under 19    the laws of this State, any other state, or the United 20    States;21        (2) the person has been convicted of any violation of 22    Article 28 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal 23    Code of 2012, or substantially similar laws of any other 24    jurisdiction;25        (3) the person has submitted an application for a 26    license under this Act which contains false information;  SB2661- 3 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1        (4) the person is a member of the Board;2        (5) a person defined in (1), (2), (3), or (4) is an 3    officer, director, or managerial employee of the entity;4        (6) the entity employs a person defined in (1), (2), 5    (3), or (4) who participates in the management or 6    operation of gambling operations authorized under this 7    Act;8        (7) (blank); or9        (8) a license of the person or entity issued under 10    this Act, or a license to own or operate gambling 11    facilities in any other jurisdiction, has been revoked.12    The Board is expressly prohibited from making changes to 13the requirement that licensees make payment into the Horse 14Racing Equity Trust Fund without the express authority of the 15Illinois General Assembly and making any other rule to 16implement or interpret Public Act 95-1008. For the purposes of 17this paragraph, "rules" is given the meaning given to that 18term in Section 1-70 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure 19Act.20    (b) In determining whether to grant or renew an owners 21license to an applicant, the Board shall consider:22        (1) the character, reputation, experience, and 23    financial integrity of the applicants and of any other or 24    separate person that either:25            (A) controls, directly or indirectly, such 26        applicant; or  SB2661- 4 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1            (B) is controlled, directly or indirectly, by such 2        applicant or by a person which controls, directly or 3        indirectly, such applicant;4        (2) the facilities or proposed facilities for the 5    conduct of gambling;6        (3) the highest prospective total revenue to be 7    derived by the State from the conduct of gambling;8        (4) the extent to which the ownership of the applicant 9    reflects the diversity of the State by including minority 10    persons, women, and persons with a disability and the good 11    faith affirmative action plan of each applicant to 12    recruit, train and upgrade minority persons, women, and 13    persons with a disability in all employment 14    classifications; the Board shall further consider granting 15    an owners license and giving preference to an applicant 16    under this Section to applicants in which minority persons 17    and women hold ownership interest of at least 16% and 4%, 18    respectively; 19        (4.5) the extent to which the ownership of the 20    applicant includes veterans of service in the armed forces 21    of the United States, and the good faith affirmative 22    action plan of each applicant to recruit, train, and 23    upgrade veterans of service in the armed forces of the 24    United States in all employment classifications; 25        (5) the financial ability of the applicant to purchase 26    and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance;  SB2661- 5 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1        (6) whether the applicant has adequate capitalization 2    to provide and maintain, for the duration of a license, a 3    riverboat or casino;4        (7) the extent to which the applicant exceeds or meets 5    other standards for the issuance of an owners license 6    which the Board may adopt by rule; 7        (8) the amount of the applicant's license bid;8        (9) the extent to which the applicant or the proposed 9    host municipality plans to enter into revenue-sharing 10    revenue sharing agreements with communities other than the 11    host municipality;12        (9.5) whether the applicant has complied with 13    subsection (b-5) of this Section; 14        (10) the extent to which the ownership of an applicant 15    includes the most qualified number of minority persons, 16    women, and persons with a disability; and17        (11) whether the applicant has entered into a fully 18    executed construction project labor agreement with the 19    applicable local building trades council.20    (b-5) If an applicant for an owners license or a host 21municipality has entered into a revenue-sharing agreement with 22one or more communities other than the host municipality, the 23parties to the revenue-sharing agreement must file with the 24Board (i) a copy of the revenue-sharing agreement, (ii) a copy 25of all amendments or other modifications that are made to the 26revenue-sharing agreement, and (iii) proof of having provided   SB2661- 6 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1notice to all communities that may be affected in any way by 2the amendments or modifications to the revenue-sharing 3agreement. 4    (c) Each owners license shall specify the place where the 5casino shall operate or the riverboat shall operate and dock.6    (d) Each applicant shall submit with his or her 7application, on forms provided by the Board, 2 sets of his or 8her fingerprints.9    (e) In addition to any licenses authorized under 10subsection (e-5) of this Section, the Board may issue up to 10 11licenses authorizing the holders of such licenses to own 12riverboats. In the application for an owners license, the 13applicant shall state the dock at which the riverboat is based 14and the water on which the riverboat will be located. The Board 15shall issue 5 licenses to become effective not earlier than 16January 1, 1991. Three of such licenses shall authorize 17riverboat gambling on the Mississippi River, or, with approval 18by the municipality in which the riverboat was docked on 19August 7, 2003 and with Board approval, be authorized to 20relocate to a new location, in a municipality that (1) borders 21on the Mississippi River or is within 5 miles of the city 22limits of a municipality that borders on the Mississippi River 23and (2) on August 7, 2003, had a riverboat conducting 24riverboat gambling operations pursuant to a license issued 25under this Act; one of which shall authorize riverboat 26gambling from a home dock in the city of East St. Louis; and   SB2661- 7 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1one of which shall authorize riverboat gambling from a home 2dock in the City of Alton. One other license shall authorize 3riverboat gambling on the Illinois River in the City of East 4Peoria or, with Board approval, shall authorize land-based 5gambling operations anywhere within the corporate limits of 6the City of Peoria. The Board shall issue one additional 7license to become effective not earlier than March 1, 1992, 8which shall authorize riverboat gambling on the Des Plaines 9River in Will County. The Board may issue 4 additional 10licenses to become effective not earlier than March 1, 1992. 11In determining the water upon which riverboats will operate, 12the Board shall consider the economic benefit which riverboat 13gambling confers on the State, and shall seek to assure that 14all regions of the State share in the economic benefits of 15riverboat gambling.16    In granting all licenses, the Board may give favorable 17consideration to economically depressed areas of the State, to 18applicants presenting plans which provide for significant 19economic development over a large geographic area, and to 20applicants who currently operate non-gambling riverboats in 21Illinois. The Board shall review all applications for owners 22licenses, and shall inform each applicant of the Board's 23decision. The Board may grant an owners license to an 24applicant that has not submitted the highest license bid, but 25if it does not select the highest bidder, the Board shall issue 26a written decision explaining why another applicant was   SB2661- 8 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1selected and identifying the factors set forth in this Section 2that favored the winning bidder. The fee for issuance or 3renewal of a license pursuant to this subsection (e) shall be 4$250,000.5    (e-5) In addition to licenses authorized under subsection 6(e) of this Section:7        (1) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 8    the conduct of casino gambling in the City of Chicago;9        (2) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 10    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Danville;11        (3) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 12    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Waukegan;13        (4) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 14    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the City of Rockford;15        (5) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 16    the conduct of riverboat gambling in a municipality that 17    is wholly or partially located in one of the following 18    townships of Cook County: Bloom, Bremen, Calumet, Rich, 19    Thornton, or Worth Township; and20        (6) the Board may issue one owners license authorizing 21    the conduct of riverboat gambling in the unincorporated 22    area of Williamson County adjacent to the Big Muddy River.23    Except for the license authorized under paragraph (1), 24each application for a license pursuant to this subsection 25(e-5) shall be submitted to the Board no later than 120 days 26after June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-31).   SB2661- 9 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1All applications for a license under this subsection (e-5) 2shall include the nonrefundable application fee and the 3nonrefundable background investigation fee as provided in 4subsection (d) of Section 6 of this Act. In the event that an 5applicant submits an application for a license pursuant to 6this subsection (e-5) prior to June 28, 2019 (the effective 7date of Public Act 101-31), such applicant shall submit the 8nonrefundable application fee and background investigation fee 9as provided in subsection (d) of Section 6 of this Act no later 10than 6 months after June 28, 2019 (the effective date of Public 11Act 101-31). 12    The Board shall consider issuing a license pursuant to 13paragraphs (1) through (6) of this subsection only after the 14corporate authority of the municipality or the county board of 15the county in which the riverboat or casino shall be located 16has certified to the Board the following:17        (i) that the applicant has negotiated with the 18    corporate authority or county board in good faith;19        (ii) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 20    county board have mutually agreed on the permanent 21    location of the riverboat or casino;22        (iii) that the applicant and the corporate authority 23    or county board have mutually agreed on the temporary 24    location of the riverboat or casino;25        (iv) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 26    the county board have mutually agreed on the percentage of   SB2661- 10 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1    revenues that will be shared with the municipality or 2    county, if any;3        (v) that the applicant and the corporate authority or 4    county board have mutually agreed on any zoning, 5    licensing, public health, or other issues that are within 6    the jurisdiction of the municipality or county;7        (vi) that the corporate authority or county board has 8    passed a resolution or ordinance in support of the 9    riverboat or casino in the municipality or county; 10        (vii) the applicant for a license under paragraph (1) 11    has made a public presentation concerning its casino 12    proposal; and13        (viii) the applicant for a license under paragraph (1) 14    has prepared a summary of its casino proposal and such 15    summary has been posted on a public website of the 16    municipality or the county. 17    At least 7 days before the corporate authority of a 18municipality or county board of the county submits a 19certification to the Board concerning items (i) through (viii) 20of this subsection, it shall hold a public hearing to discuss 21items (i) through (viii), as well as any other details 22concerning the proposed riverboat or casino in the 23municipality or county. The corporate authority or county 24board must subsequently memorialize the details concerning the 25proposed riverboat or casino in a resolution that must be 26adopted by a majority of the corporate authority or county   SB2661- 11 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1board before any certification is sent to the Board. The Board 2shall not alter, amend, change, or otherwise interfere with 3any agreement between the applicant and the corporate 4authority of the municipality or county board of the county 5regarding the location of any temporary or permanent facility. 6    In addition, within 10 days after June 28, 2019 (the 7effective date of Public Act 101-31), the Board, with consent 8and at the expense of the City of Chicago, shall select and 9retain the services of a nationally recognized casino gaming 10feasibility consultant. Within 45 days after June 28, 2019 11(the effective date of Public Act 101-31), the consultant 12shall prepare and deliver to the Board a study concerning the 13feasibility of, and the ability to finance, a casino in the 14City of Chicago. The feasibility study shall be delivered to 15the Mayor of the City of Chicago, the Governor, the President 16of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 17Representatives. Ninety days after receipt of the feasibility 18study, the Board shall make a determination, based on the 19results of the feasibility study, whether to recommend to the 20General Assembly that the terms of the license under paragraph 21(1) of this subsection (e-5) should be modified. The Board may 22begin accepting applications for the owners license under 23paragraph (1) of this subsection (e-5) upon the determination 24to issue such an owners license. 25    In addition, prior to the Board issuing the owners license 26authorized under paragraph (4) of subsection (e-5), an impact   SB2661- 12 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1study shall be completed to determine what location in the 2city will provide the greater impact to the region, including 3the creation of jobs and the generation of tax revenue. 4    (e-10) The licenses authorized under subsection (e-5) of 5this Section shall be issued within 12 months after the date 6the license application is submitted. If the Board does not 7issue the licenses within that time period, then the Board 8shall give a written explanation to the applicant as to why it 9has not reached a determination and when it reasonably expects 10to make a determination. The fee for the issuance or renewal of 11a license issued pursuant to this subsection (e-10) shall be 12$250,000. Additionally, a licensee located outside of Cook 13County shall pay a minimum initial fee of $17,500 per gaming 14position, and a licensee located in Cook County shall pay a 15minimum initial fee of $30,000 per gaming position. The 16initial fees payable under this subsection (e-10) shall be 17deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. If at any 18point after June 1, 2020 there are no pending applications for 19a license under subsection (e-5) and not all licenses 20authorized under subsection (e-5) have been issued, then the 21Board shall reopen the license application process for those 22licenses authorized under subsection (e-5) that have not been 23issued. The Board shall follow the licensing process provided 24in subsection (e-5) with all time frames tied to the last date 25of a final order issued by the Board under subsection (e-5) 26rather than the effective date of the amendatory Act.  SB2661- 13 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1    (e-15) Each licensee of a license authorized under 2subsection (e-5) of this Section shall make a reconciliation 3payment 3 years after the date the licensee begins operating 4in an amount equal to 75% of the adjusted gross receipts for 5the most lucrative 12-month period of operations, minus an 6amount equal to the initial payment per gaming position paid 7by the specific licensee. Each licensee shall pay a 8$15,000,000 reconciliation fee upon issuance of an owners 9license. If this calculation results in a negative amount, 10then the licensee is not entitled to any reimbursement of fees 11previously paid. This reconciliation payment may be made in 12installments over a period of no more than 6 years. 13    All payments by licensees under this subsection (e-15) 14shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund.15    (e-20) In addition to any other revocation powers granted 16to the Board under this Act, the Board may revoke the owners 17license of a licensee which fails to begin conducting gambling 18within 15 months of receipt of the Board's approval of the 19application if the Board determines that license revocation is 20in the best interests of the State.21    (f) The first 10 owners licenses issued under this Act 22shall permit the holder to own up to 2 riverboats and equipment 23thereon for a period of 3 years after the effective date of the 24license. Holders of the first 10 owners licenses must pay the 25annual license fee for each of the 3 years during which they 26are authorized to own riverboats.  SB2661- 14 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1    (g) Upon the termination, expiration, or revocation of 2each of the first 10 licenses, which shall be issued for a 33-year period, all licenses are renewable annually upon 4payment of the fee and a determination by the Board that the 5licensee continues to meet all of the requirements of this Act 6and the Board's rules. However, for licenses renewed on or 7after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 102nd 8General Assembly, renewal shall be for a period of 4 years. 9    (h) An owners license, except for an owners license issued 10under subsection (e-5) of this Section, shall entitle the 11licensee to own up to 2 riverboats. 12    An owners licensee of a casino or riverboat that is 13located in the City of Chicago pursuant to paragraph (1) of 14subsection (e-5) of this Section shall limit the number of 15gaming positions to 4,000 for such owner. An owners licensee 16authorized under subsection (e) or paragraph (2), (3), (4), or 17(5) of subsection (e-5) of this Section shall limit the number 18of gaming positions to 2,000 for any such owners license. An 19owners licensee authorized under paragraph (6) of subsection 20(e-5) of this Section shall limit the number of gaming 21positions to 1,200 for such owner. The initial fee for each 22gaming position obtained on or after June 28, 2019 (the 23effective date of Public Act 101-31) shall be a minimum of 24$17,500 for licensees not located in Cook County and a minimum 25of $30,000 for licensees located in Cook County, in addition 26to the reconciliation payment, as set forth in subsection   SB2661- 15 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1(e-15) of this Section. The fees under this subsection (h) 2shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 3The fees under this subsection (h) that are paid by an owners 4licensee authorized under subsection (e) shall be paid by July 51, 2021.6    Each owners licensee under subsection (e) of this Section 7shall reserve its gaming positions within 30 days after June 828, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 101-31). The Board 9may grant an extension to this 30-day period, provided that 10the owners licensee submits a written request and explanation 11as to why it is unable to reserve its positions within the 1230-day period.13    Each owners licensee under subsection (e-5) of this 14Section shall reserve its gaming positions within 30 days 15after issuance of its owners license. The Board may grant an 16extension to this 30-day period, provided that the owners 17licensee submits a written request and explanation as to why 18it is unable to reserve its positions within the 30-day 19period.20    A licensee may operate both of its riverboats 21concurrently, provided that the total number of gaming 22positions on both riverboats does not exceed the limit 23established pursuant to this subsection. Riverboats licensed 24to operate on the Mississippi River and the Illinois River 25south of Marshall County shall have an authorized capacity of 26at least 500 persons. Any other riverboat licensed under this   SB2661- 16 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1Act shall have an authorized capacity of at least 400 persons.2    (h-5) An owners licensee who conducted gambling operations 3prior to January 1, 2012 and obtains positions pursuant to 4Public Act 101-31 shall make a reconciliation payment 3 years 5after any additional gaming positions begin operating in an 6amount equal to 75% of the owners licensee's average gross 7receipts for the most lucrative 12-month period of operations 8minus an amount equal to the initial fee that the owners 9licensee paid per additional gaming position. For purposes of 10this subsection (h-5), "average gross receipts" means (i) the 11increase in adjusted gross receipts for the most lucrative 1212-month period of operations over the adjusted gross receipts 13for 2019, multiplied by (ii) the percentage derived by 14dividing the number of additional gaming positions that an 15owners licensee had obtained by the total number of gaming 16positions operated by the owners licensee. If this calculation 17results in a negative amount, then the owners licensee is not 18entitled to any reimbursement of fees previously paid. This 19reconciliation payment may be made in installments over a 20period of no more than 6 years. These reconciliation payments 21shall be deposited into the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund. 22    (i) A licensed owner is authorized to apply to the Board 23for and, if approved therefor, to receive all licenses from 24the Board necessary for the operation of a riverboat or 25casino, including a liquor license, a license to prepare and 26serve food for human consumption, and other necessary   SB2661- 17 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1licenses. All use, occupation, and excise taxes which apply to 2the sale of food and beverages in this State and all taxes 3imposed on the sale or use of tangible personal property apply 4to such sales aboard the riverboat or in the casino.5    (j) The Board may issue or re-issue a license authorizing 6a riverboat to dock in a municipality or approve a relocation 7under Section 11.2 only if, prior to the issuance or 8re-issuance of the license or approval, the governing body of 9the municipality in which the riverboat will dock has by a 10majority vote approved the docking of riverboats in the 11municipality. The Board may issue or re-issue a license 12authorizing a riverboat to dock in areas of a county outside 13any municipality or approve a relocation under Section 11.2 14only if, prior to the issuance or re-issuance of the license or 15approval, the governing body of the county has by a majority 16vote approved of the docking of riverboats within such areas.17    (k) An owners licensee may conduct land-based gambling 18operations upon approval by the Board and payment of a fee of 19$250,000, which shall be deposited into the State Gaming Fund. 20    (l) An owners licensee may conduct gaming at a temporary 21facility pending the construction of a permanent facility or 22the remodeling or relocation of an existing facility to 23accommodate gaming participants for up to 24 months after the 24temporary facility begins to conduct gaming. Upon request by 25an owners licensee and upon a showing of good cause by the 26owners licensee: (i) for a licensee authorized under paragraph   SB2661- 18 -LRB104 13629 JDS 26261 b1(3) of subsection (e-5), the Board shall extend the period 2during which the licensee may conduct gaming at a temporary 3facility by up to 30 months; and (ii) for all other licensees, 4the Board shall extend the period during which the licensee 5may conduct gaming at a temporary facility by up to 12 months. 6The Board shall make rules concerning the conduct of gaming 7from temporary facilities.8(Source: P.A. 102-13, eff. 6-10-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 9103-574, eff. 12-8-23.) 10    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 11becoming law.